Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.070

Service by sheriff if directed to another.

If the writ be directed to any other person, it shall be delivered to the sheriff and shall be by him or her served by delivering the same to such person without delay.

[ 2011 c 336 s 189; Code 1881 s 671; 1877 p 139 s 674; 1869 p 156 s 611; 1854 p 212 s 430; RRS s 1069.]